Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-537
Class V school district; school board; school census; duty to take.

The school board of a Class V school district shall cause to be taken an enumeration of all persons each year from birth through twenty years of age residing in the school district. It shall include such other information as is required by sections 79-524, 79-528, and 79-578, except that the information required by sections 79-524 and 79-578 as to children under five years of age may be limited to the number of children by age level and shall not include the names of all the taxpayers in the district. The board may, at its option, establish a permanent and continuing census or enumeration of school children.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 16, p. 322;

R.S.1913, § 7022;

C.S.1922, § 6653;

C.S.1929, § 79-2716;

R.S.1943, § 79-2717;

Laws 1945, c. 213, § 1, p. 626;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 263, p. 779;

Laws 1957, c. 354, § 1, p. 1201;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1006;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 290;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 74.